New York, session 2025-2026, S8089.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The opening paragraph of subdivision 1 of section 5 of the 2 legislative law, as amended by chapter 841 of the laws of 2022, is 3 amended to read as follows: 4 Effective January first, two thousand twenty-three, each member of the 5 legislature shall receive a salary of one hundred forty-two thousand 6 dollars per annum. Such salary of a member of the legislature shall be 7 payable in twenty-six bi-weekly installments provided, however, that if 8 legislative passage of the budget as defined in subdivision three of 9 this section has not occurred prior to the first day of any fiscal year, 10 the net amount of any such bi-weekly salary installment payments to be 11 paid on or after such day shall be withheld and not paid until such 12 legislative passage of the budget has occurred whereupon bi-weekly sala- 13 ry installment payments shall resume and an amount equal to the accrued, 14 withheld and unpaid installments shall be promptly paid to each member. 15 However, in years where a pay period occurs on January first of a given 16 year, members' salaries shall be payable in twenty-seven bi-weekly 17 payments. 18 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD03631-01-5